Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska90-272
Game and Parks Commission; convey
property to village of Arnold.

The Game and Parks Commission is authorized to convey to
the village of Arnold for public park purposes the following described real
estate now known as Arnold State Recreation Area, situated in the county of
Custer, in the State of Nebraska, to-wit: A tract of land in the northwest
quarter of the southeast quarter of section 28, township 17 north, range 25
west of the 6th principal meridian, described as follows: Beginning at the
northeast corner of said northwest quarter of the southeast quarter, running
thence west 660.0 feet, thence south 330.0 feet, thence south 45 degrees east
to a point 330.0 feet north of the southeast corner of said northwest quarter
of the southeast quarter, thence north 990.0 feet to the place of beginning,
and containing 10 acres more or less; and a tract of land in the northeast
quarter of the southeast quarter of section 28, township 17 north, range 25
west of the 6th principal meridian, described as follows: Beginning at the
northwest corner of said northeast quarter of the southeast quarter, running
thence east 660.0 feet, more or less, to the center of the channel of the
South Loup River, thence in a southerly and easterly direction along the center
of the channel of said river to its intersection with the east line of said
northeast quarter of the southeast quarter, said point of intersection being
528.0 feet, more or less, south of the northeast corner of said northeast
quarter of the southeast quarter, thence south along said east line 630.0
feet, thence west 1,320.0 feet, more or less, to the west line of said northeast
quarter of the southeast quarter, thence north along said west line 1,158.0
feet to the place of beginning, and containing 30 acres, more or less, except
that if the village of Arnold ceases to operate the lands conveyed as a public
park and recreation area, title to such lands shall revert to the Game and
Parks Commission.

Laws 2010, LB743, § 1.